Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-402
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Athletic Training Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-404 to 38-407.02 apply.

Laws 1986, LB 355, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 477;

Laws 1999, LB 178, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 140;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 65;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,238;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 359;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 174;

Laws 2022, LB436, § 2.